Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.190

Will to operate on after-acquired property.

Any estate, right or interest in property acquired by the testator after the making of his or her will may pass thereby and in like manner as if title thereto was vested in him or her at the time of making the will, unless the contrary manifestly appears by the will to have been the intention of the testator.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2014; 1965 c 145 s 11.12.190. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 41; RRS s 1411; prior: Code 1881 s 1334; 1863 p 210 s 71; 1860 p 172 s 38.]